Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4227.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1308g. Subject to appropriation, the board of each
intermediate school district shall designate at least 1 emergency
and safety manager and at least 1 mental health coordinator. All of
the following apply to the roles described in this section, as
applicable:
(a) An individual designated as an emergency and safety
manager shall do all of the following:
(i) Serve as a liaison between state agency school safety
offices, the emergency management and homeland security division
CRM H00085'25 (H-2) xbfim1


within the department of state police, emergency management and
homeland security district coordinators, local emergency management
coordinators, the state fire marshal, public schools and nonpublic
schools located within the geographic boundaries of the
intermediate school district, and the school safety and mental
health commission created under section 6 of the comprehensive
school safety plan act, 2018 PA 548, MCL 28.806.
(ii) Work with school administrators, local and state emergency
management coordinators, and emergency responders to implement
prevention programs related to school safety; communicate with
parents, legal guardians, and the community about school safety;
and handle all safety-related issues concerning schools located in
the geographic boundaries of the intermediate school district.
(iii) Perform risk assessments of, and provide response training
in, the intermediate school district and public schools and
nonpublic schools located in the intermediate school district.
(iv) Compile data to measure outcomes and performance related
to school safety plans, school safety trainings, school safety
products, and other school safety measures in the intermediate
school district and public schools and nonpublic schools in the
geographic boundaries of the intermediate school district.
(b) An individual designated as a mental health coordinator
shall do all of the following:
(i) Coordinate state funding intended to enhance and expand the
availability of mental health services and supports for students.
(ii) Coordinate the integration of community-based or faith-
based mental health services in the intermediate school district
and public schools and nonpublic schools located in the geographic
boundaries of the intermediate school district and foster
CRM H00085'25 (H-2) xbfim1


partnerships between the intermediate school district, public
schools, nonpublic schools, and mental health providers.
(iii) Facilitate behavioral health assessment teams.
(iv) Develop and implement a comprehensive school-community
mental health system.
(v) Develop and curate a behavioral health community resource
map.
(vi) Facilitate and support the deployment of BH-Works, the
behavioral health care platform, in the intermediate school
district and public schools located in the geographic boundaries of
the intermediate school district.
(vii) Compile data to measure outcomes and performance of
behavioral health programs in the intermediate school district and
public schools and nonpublic schools located in the geographic
boundaries of the intermediate school district.
(viii) Recruit, retain, and develop behavioral health providers
for or in the intermediate school district and public schools and
nonpublic schools located in the geographic boundaries of the
intermediate school district.
(ix) Provide training and coaching and coordinate professional
learning opportunities in the intermediate school district and
public schools and nonpublic schools located in the geographic
boundaries of the intermediate school district.
(x) Oversee and monitor, in compliance with other laws,
Medicaid billing and the Caring for Students (C4S) program as it
pertains to the intermediate school district and public schools and
nonpublic schools located in the geographic boundaries of the
intermediate school district.
(xi) Meet and work with school mental health professionals,
CRM H00085'25 (H-2) xbfim1


including, but not limited to, psychologists, social workers,
doctors, nurses, athletic trainers, and psychiatrists, to connect
the intermediate school district and public schools and nonpublic
schools located within the geographic boundaries of the
intermediate school district with child and adolescent health
centers, state departments and agencies, local governments, social
service agencies, and health care organizations to aid in the
identification and support of students at risk for behavioral
health issues.
Final Page
CRM H00085'25 (H-2) xbfim1